st.aff
FLAG long
SFX q. Y 9
SFX q. enir enu/ enir # po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. tir ti/ tir # po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. courir couru/ courir # po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. ivre écu/ vivre # po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. aire u/ aire # po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. dre du/ dre # po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. valoir valu/ .valoir # po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. aître u/ aître # po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. aitre u/ aitre # po:ppas is:epi is:inv
