st.dic
comparaitre/wQq.  # po:v3_i_____a
comparaître/wQq.  # po:v3_i_____a
mentir/i5q.  # po:v3_i_nq__a
recomparaitre/wQq.  # po:v3_i_____a
recomparaître/wQq.  # po:v3_i_____a
subvenir/i0q.  # po:v3___n___a
survivre/xSq.  # po:v3_i_nq__a
transparaitre/wQq.  # po:v3_i_____a
transparaître/wQq.  # po:v3_i_____a
